Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4049.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 204. (1) A zoning ordinance adopted under this act shall provide for the use of a single-family residence by an occupant of that residence for a home occupation to give instruction in a craft or fine art within the residence. (2) The rearing of egg-laying hens is a permitted use of property under a zoning ordinance and is not subject to a special land use approval or any other approval under this act if both of the following requirements are met: (a) The property is at least 1/4 acre in size. (b) The number of hens does not exceed 5 hens for every 1/4 acre of property size or a total of 25 hens, whichever is less. (3) This section does not prohibit the regulation of noise, advertising, traffic, hours of operation, or other conditions that may accompany the a use of a residence under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4050 (request no. H01183'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.